Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Promotion of Voting

117.900.
Election
essay and slogan contests — Private sponsorship.

The Secretary of State shall implement an annual statewide essay contest for students in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) and an annual statewide slogan contest, each to be relative to an elections-related topic to be chosen by the Secretary of State each year. The Secretary of State shall publicize the contests, present awards or certificates to the essay winner in each grade level and to the slogan contest winner in a public ceremony, and provide appropriate publicity for the winning entries.

The Secretary of State shall solicit sponsorship for the essay and slogan contests so that, in addition to awards or certificates, winners shall receive a monetary award, as funds are available from sponsors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 42, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2005, ch. 71, § 6, effective June 20, 2005.